District of Columbia statutes.
50-605

Council to make regulations; public hearings.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to promulgate regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, that no such regulation shall become effective until after a public hearing has been held thereon.

Apr. 22, 1960, 74 Stat. 73, Pub. L. 86-431, § 6

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1105.
1973 Ed., § 40-905.

Prior Codifications

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “District of Columbia Automobile Financing and Repossession Act of 1981” (D.C. Law 4-90, March 31, 1982, 29 DCR 666).

New Implementing Regulations

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(316) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government